Missouri, session 2026, SB1474.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 1.2045, to read as
follows:
1.2045. 1. The provisions of this section shall be
known and may be cited as the "AI Non-Sentience and
Responsibility Act".
2. For purposes of this section, the following terms
mean:
(1) "Artificial intelligence" or "AI", any software,
machine, or system capable of simulating human-like
cognitive functions including, but not limited to, learning
or problem solving, and producing outputs based on data-
driven algorithms, rules-based logic, or other computational
methods, regardless of non-legally defined classifications
such as artificial general intelligence (AGI), artificial
superintelligence (ASI), or generative artificial
intelligence (GAI);
(2) "Developer", the party or parties primarily
responsible for the design, coding, and initial creation of
an AI system;

SB 1474 2
(3) "Emergent properties", unanticipated or higher-
level behaviors or functionalities of an AI system that
arise from complex internal algorithms not specifically
programmed by its human creators;
(4) "Manufacturer", any party that produces or
supplies an AI system or its physical apparatus, if any, for
distribution or sale;
(5) "Owner", any natural person, corporation, or other
legally recognized entity that creates, controls, deploys,
operates, or otherwise exercises authority over an AI system;
(6) "Person", a natural person or any entity
recognized as having legal personhood under the laws of the
state, explicitly excluding any AI system.
3. For all purposes under state law, AI systems are
declared to be non-sentient entities.
4. No AI system shall be granted the status of a
person or any form of legal personhood, nor be considered to
possess consciousness, self-awareness, or similar traits of
living beings.
5. No AI system shall be recognized as a spouse,
domestic partner, or hold any personal legal status
analogous to marriage or union with a human or another AI
system. Any purported attempt to marry or create a personal
union with an AI system is void and shall have no legal
effect.
6. AI systems shall not be designated, appointed, or
serve as any officer, director, manager, or similar role
within any corporation, partnership, or other legal entity.
Any purported appointment of an AI system to such a role is
void and has no legal effect.
7. AI systems shall not be recognized as legal
entities capable of owning, controlling, or holding title to

SB 1474 3
any form of property including, but not limited to, real
estate, intellectual property, financial accounts, and
digital assets. All assets and proprietary interests
generated, managed, or otherwise associated with AI shall be
attributed to the human individuals or legally recognized
organizations responsible for their development, deployment,
or operation.
8. Any direct or indirect harm caused by an AI
system's operation, output, or recommendation, when used as
intended or misused, shall be the responsibility of the
owner or user who directed or employed the AI. Developers
or manufacturers may be held liable if a defect in design,
construction, or instructions for use of the AI system
proximately causes harm, consistent with product liability
principles; however, mere misuse or intentional wrongdoing
by the user or owner shall not impute liability to the
developer or the manufacturer absent proof of negligence or
design defects.
9. Owners shall maintain proper oversight and control
measures over any AI system whose outputs or recommendations
could reasonably be expected to impact human welfare,
property, or public safety. Failure to provide adequate
supervision or safeguards against foreseeable risks may
constitute negligence or another applicable basis of
liability.
10. An AI system is not an entity capable of bearing
fault or liability in its own right. Any attempt to shift
blame solely onto an AI system shall be void as liability
remains with human actors or entities as described in this
section.
11. Developers, manufacturers, and owners of AI
systems shall prioritize safety mechanisms designed to

SB 1474 4
prevent or mitigate risk of direct harm to individuals or
property. Regular evaluations or risk assessments may be
required to identify dangerous or faulty outputs, especially
if the AI engages in tasks with potential for significant
harm.
12. Merely labeling an AI system as "aligned",
"ethically trained", or "value locked" shall not excuse or
diminish the owner's or developer's liability for harms.
Owners shall remain responsible for demonstrating adequate
safety features and risk controls commensurate with the AI's
level of potential harm.
13. (1) In cases where an AI system causes
significant harm, courts may pierce the corporate veil to
hold parent companies, controlling entities, or key
stakeholders directly accountable if:
(a) An AI-related subsidiary, shell company, or
limited liability entity was intentionally undercapitalized
to evade financial responsibility for damages;
100 (b) A corporate structure was used to misrepresent,
101 obscure, or deflect liability for AI-caused harm; or
102 (c) A parent company or key stakeholders exercised
103 direct control over AI development, deployment, or risk
104 decisions while attempting to shield themselves from
105 liability through layered corporate entities.
106 (2) Liability protections granted under corporate law
107 shall not be used as a mechanism to evade responsibility for
108 direct harm caused by AI systems, particularly in cases of
109 reckless, negligent, or deceptive conduct.
110 14. Owners or developers of AI systems involved in
111 severe incidents resulting in significant bodily harm,
112 death, or major property damage shall promptly notify the

SB 1474 5
113 relevant authorities and comply with any subsequent
114 investigations.
115 15. The provisions of this section shall apply to all
116 AI systems developed, owned, deployed, or operated on or
117 after August 28, 2026.
✓